Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 35.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201077-1035
Act; restrictions on use.

The Nebraska
Advantage Transformational Tourism and Redevelopment Act may not be used for
the construction or financing of a stadium or for support facilities for a
stadium.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 35.